Hawaii statutes.
[GENERAL PROVISIONS]

Revision Note

Part heading added by
revisor.

§261-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Aeronautics"
means the science and art of flight, including but not limited to
transportation by aircraft; the operation, construction, repair, or maintenance
of aircraft, aircraft power plants and accessories, including the repair,
packing, and maintenance of parachutes; the design, establishment,
construction, extension, operation, improvement, repair, or maintenance of
airports, or other air navigation facilities; and instruction in flying or
ground subjects pertaining thereto.

"Aircraft"
means any contrivance now known or hereafter invented, used or designed for
navigation of or flight in the air.

"Airman"
means any individual who engages, as the person in command, or as pilot,
mechanic, or member of the crew, in the navigation of aircraft while under way,
and any individual who is directly in charge of the inspection, maintenance,
overhauling, or repair of aircraft engines, airframes, propellers, or
appliances; and any individual who serves in the capacity of aircraft
dispatcher, or air-traffic control-tower operator; but does not include any
individual employed outside the United States, and its territories and
possessions, or any individual employed by a manufacturer of aircraft, aircraft
engines, propellers, or appliances to perform duties as inspector or mechanic
in connection therewith, or any individual performing inspection or mechanical
duties in connection with aircraft owned or operated by the individual.

"Air
navigation facility" means any facility used in, available for use in, or
designed for use in, aid of air navigation, including any structures,
mechanisms, light, beacons, markers, communicating systems, or other instrumentalities,
or devices used or useful as an aid, or constituting an advantage or
convenience, to the safe taking-off, navigation, and landing of aircraft, or
the safe and efficient operation or maintenance of an airport, and any
combination of any or all of such facilities.

"Airport"
means any area of land or water which is used, or intended for use, for the
landing and takeoff of aircraft, and any appurtenant areas which are used, or
intended for use, for airport buildings or other airport facilities or
rights-of-way, including approaches, together with all airport buildings and
facilities located thereon.

"Airport
hazard" has the meaning defined by section 262-1.

"Criminal
history record check" means an examination of an individual's criminal history
records by means including, but not limited to, fingerprint analysis and name
inquiry into state and national criminal history record files.

"Criminal
history record information" means criminal history information received
from state and national criminal history record checks.

"Department"
means the department of transportation.

"Director"
means the director of transportation.

"Municipal"
means pertaining to a municipality as herein defined.

"Municipality"
means any county or other political subdivision or public corporation of the
State.

"Operation
of aircraft" or "operate aircraft" means the use, navigation, or
piloting of aircraft in the airspace over the State or upon any airport within
the State.

"Person"
means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association,
joint stock association, or body politic; and includes any trustee, receiver,
assignee, or other similar representative thereof.

"Police
officer" means a police officer and any other state or county officer
charged with the enforcement of state laws.

"State
airway" means a route in the navigable airspace over and above the lands
or waters of the State, designated by the department as a route suitable for
air navigation. [L 1947, c 32, pt of §1; RL 1955, §15-1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§26; HRS §261-1; am L 1981, c 25, §2; gen ch
1985; am L 1996, c 191, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next